Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Chapter 3 Desertion of Spouse or Children

Cross references. —

As to Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, see chapter 4 of this title.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Status of Legal Abandonment in Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 205.

For article, “Enforcement of Civil Liability for Non-Support in the State of Wyoming,” see 8 Wyo. L.J. 227 (1954).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

23 Am. Jur. 2d Desertion and Nonsupport §§ 1 to 70, 78; 41 Am. Jur. 2d Husband and Wife §§ 329 to 386; 59 Am. Jur. 2d Parent and Child §§ 9 to 13, 48, 51 to 56, 58 to 68, 73 to 75, 79 to 86.

Parent's obligation to support adult child, 1 ALR2d 910.

Maintenance of suit by child, independently of statute, against parent for support, 13 ALR2d 1142.

Jurisdiction and venue of criminal charge for child desertion or nonsupport as affected by nonresidence of parent or child, 44 ALR2d 886.

Father's criminal liability for desertion of or failure to support child where divorce decree awards custody to another, 73 ALR2d 960.

Application, to illegitimate children, of criminal statutes relating to abandonment, neglect and nonsupport of children, 99 ALR2d 746.

Constitutionality of gender-based classifications in criminal laws proscribing nonsupport of spouse or child, 14 ALR4th 717.

Authority of court, upon entering default judgment, to make orders for child custody or support which were not specifically requested in pleadings of prevailing party, 5 ALR5th 863.

41 C.J.S. Husband and Wife §§ 242 to 246; 67A C.J.S. Parent and Child §§ 165 to 176.

§ 20-3-101.
Desertion generally; penalty; public welfare funds; prisoner's earnings; temporary order for support.

Any spouse who, without just cause or lawful excuse, deserts the other spouse or fails or refuses to provide adequately for the support and maintenance of the other spouse and who at the time of leaving, failure or refusal is or thereafter becomes in necessitous circumstances is guilty of a crime, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

Any person who without just cause or legal excuse intentionally fails, refuses or neglects to provide adequate support which the person knows or reasonably should know the person is legally obligated to provide to a child under eighteen (18) years of age is guilty of:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both;

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not less than seven (7) days nor more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if:

The defendant has previously been convicted under this subsection; or

The support has been ordered by any court and the defendant has failed to pay the support obligation within sixty (60) days after the date payment was due.

It is an affirmative defense to a charge under subsection (a) or (b) of this section that the person was unable to provide adequate support but did provide such support as was within that person’s ability and means. A person may not demonstrate inability to provide support if the person is employable but, without reasonable excuse, fails diligently to seek employment, terminates employment or reduces earnings or assets. A person who raises an affirmative defense has the burden of proving the defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

Support of spouse or child by public welfare funds or from any source other than from the other spouse or parent as the case may be, is not just cause or lawful excuse for the spouse or parent to fail to provide support under this section.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 117, § 2.

Proceedings under this section may be instituted upon verified complaint against any person guilty of the offenses.

At any time before trial, upon petition of the complainant and notice to the defendant, the court may enter a temporary order providing for the support of the deserted spouse or children or both, pendente lite, and may punish for violation of the order as for contempt.

This state has jurisdiction over an offense under this section if conduct constituting any element of the offense or a result of that conduct occurs within this state.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 72, §§ 1 to 3; C.S. 1920, §§ 5031 to 5033; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 80; R.S. 1931, §§ 32-803 to 32-805; C.S. 1945, §§ 9-803 to 9-805; Laws 1957, ch. 77, § 1; 1961, ch. 24; W.S. 1957, §§ 20-71 to 20-73; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-3-101

; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 2; 1993, ch. 202, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2014 ch. 117, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 Amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, repealed former (e), which read: “If a person is imprisoned under this section, the court may divert any earnings of the person to the use and benefit of the spouse and any minor child as provided by W.S.

7-16-308

.”

Repeal of provisions relating to abandonment of minor children. —

Sections 9-801 and 9-802, W.C.S. 1945, providing a penalty for the abandonment of minor children by their parents or persons having lawful charge of such children, were repealed by Laws 1957, ch. 77, § 2.

Material for this chapter was taken from the Uniform Desertion and Nonsupport Act,

§§ 1 to 6 (now withdrawn), with very slight changes in terminology. Section 1 of the uniform act, however, omitted any designation of place or places of imprisonment and § 4 thereof included the word “curator” following the word “guardian”; otherwise the language of the first 6 sections of the uniform act, with the exceptions above noted, and that of this chapter was practically identical. State v. Haworth, 66 Wyo. 238, 208 P.2d 279,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1949).

Duty of mother as custodian. —

Under this section, where a child is placed in the custody of the mother pursuant to a divorce decree, the mother is required to do as much as she can do to take care of the child. State v. Haworth, 66 Wyo. 238, 208 P.2d 279,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1949).

Burden of proof. —

The state failed to prove that the defendant “without lawful excuse” by personal services, labor and earnings failed to support his child where the defendant did all he could for his child considering his ability to earn money, his physical handicaps and his meager schooling. State v. Haworth, 66 Wyo. 238, 208 P.2d 279,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1949).

Quoted

in

Heather v. Delta Drilling Co., 533 P.2d 1211,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Death of obligor parent as affecting decree for support of child, 14 ALR5th 557.

§ 20-3-102.
Ordering of payments for support in lieu of penalty; when authorized; term; release of defendant on probation; entering of recognizance; conditions of recognizance; providing for security.

Before trial with the consent of the defendant, or on entry of a plea of guilty or after conviction, instead of the penalty provided by W.S. 20-3-101(b) or in addition thereto, the court having regard to the circumstances and the financial ability or earning capacity of the defendant, may enter an order directing the defendant to pay a certain sum for not exceeding two (2) years, to the parent, the guardian or custodian of the minor child or children or to an organization or individual approved by the court as trustee. The court may release the defendant on probation for the period so fixed, upon a recognizance with or without surety in an amount as the court may order, conditioned that if the defendant appears in court whenever ordered and complies with the terms of the order of support or any modification thereof, the recognizance shall be void.

The court may require the defendant to provide any security of nonexempt property that the court deems satisfactory to secure the obligation to pay child support.

The court, upon petition and following notice and hearing, shall no longer require the order for security if the court determines:

Good cause no longer exists to require security to assure payment upon the obligation to pay child support; and

There is no overdue support outstanding.

Once the obligor has satisfied the obligation to make child support payments as ordered by the court, the security shall be released.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 72, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 5034; R.S. 1931, § 32-806; C.S. 1945, § 9-806; W.S. 1957, § 20-74; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-3-102

; Laws 1985, ch. 77, § 2; 1993, ch. 202, § 1.

§ 20-3-103.
Ordering of payments for support in lieu of penalty; violation of order; trial; sentence; forfeiture of recognizance; disposition of sum recovered.

If the court finds at any time during the period of probation the defendant has violated the terms of the order, it may forthwith proceed with the trial of the defendant under the original charge, or sentence him or her or enforce a suspended sentence under the original plea or conviction. In case of the forfeiture of recognizance, or enforcement thereof by execution, the sum recovered may be paid in whole or in part to the wife or to the guardian, custodian or trustee of the minor child or children.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 72, § 5; C.S. 1920, § 5035; R.S. 1931, § 32-807; C.S. 1945, § 9-807; W.S. 1957, § 20-75; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-3-103

.

§ 20-3-104.
Proving marriage, parenthood; spouses as witnesses; disclosure of confidential communications; desertion, neglect or refusal to support.

No other or greater evidence is required to prove the marriage of a husband and wife or that the defendant is the father or mother of a child or children than is required to prove such facts in a civil action. In a prosecution under this act [§§

20-3-101

through

20-3-104

] no statute or rule of law prohibiting the disclosure of confidential communications between husband and wife shall apply. Both husband and wife are competent witnesses to testify against each other to any relevant matters including the fact of marriage and the parentage of the child or children but neither shall be compelled to give evidence incriminating himself or herself. Proof of the desertion of the wife, child or children in destitute or necessitous circumstances, or of the neglect or refusal to provide for the support and maintenance of the wife, child or children is prima facie evidence that the desertion, neglect or refusal is willful.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 72, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 5036; R.S. 1931, § 32-808; C.S. 1945, § 9-808; W.S. 1957, § 20-76; Laws 1977, ch. 152, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, §

20-3-104

.

Cross references. —

As to husband and wife as witnesses in civil and criminal cases generally, see §§

1-12-101

through

1-12-104

.

Repealing clauses. —

Laws 1915, ch. 72, § 7, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Spouse's Testimony in Criminal Cases,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 35 (1964).

For discussion of husband-wife testimonial privilege and the Federal Rules of Evidence, see XII Land & Water L. Rev. 601 (1977).

§ 20-3-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1986, ch. 67, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to enforcement of child support orders, see §

20-6-201

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1981, ch 168, § 1, related to the enforcement of child support orders.